Florida, session 2026, HB1427.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
69
70 Section 1. Subsections (2) and (4) of section 365.171,
71 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
72 365.171 Emergency communications state plan.—
73 (2) LEGISLATIVE INTENT.—It is the intent of the
74 Legislature that the communications number "911" be the
75 designated emergency communications number. A public safety
Page 3 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1427-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1427 2026
76 agency may not advertise or otherwise promote the use of any
77 communications number for emergency response services other than
78 "911." It is further the intent of the Legislature to implement
79 and continually update a cohesive statewide emergency
80 communications plan for enhanced 911 services which will provide
81 citizens with rapid direct access to public safety agencies by
82 accessing "911" with the objective of reducing the response time
83 to situations requiring law enforcement, fire, medical, rescue,
84 and other emergency services. It is further the intent of the
85 Legislature to create a unified 911 system within each county or
86 region to serve as a single point of contact for all emergency
87 services in order to maximize efficiency of emergency services.
88 It is further the intent of the Legislature to prohibit the
89 transfer of calls between 911 call centers or other law
90 enforcement, fire, or EMS dispatch centers in the same county,
91 to maximize the efficiency of the statewide emergency
92 communications plan for residents dialing "911" for emergency
93 services. It is further the intent of the Legislature to
94 maximize interoperability of public safety agencies within each
95 county and statewide to maximize the efficiency of emergency
96 communications for residents dialing "911" for emergency
97 services. The goal of interoperability is to ensure that 911
98 calls for emergency services, as well as communication and
99 responses to catastrophic events, are connected directly so that
100 critical information and resources across multiple disciplines
Page 4 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1427-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1427 2026
101 and agencies are coordinated.
102 (4) STATE PLAN.—The office shall develop, maintain, and
103 implement appropriate modifications for a statewide emergency
104 communications plan. The plan shall provide for:
105 (a) The public agency emergency communications
106 requirements for each entity of local government in the state.
107 (b) A system to meet specific local government
108 requirements. Such system shall include law enforcement,
109 firefighting, and emergency medical services and may include
110 other emergency services such as poison control, suicide
111 prevention, and emergency management services.
112 (c) Identification of the mutual aid agreements necessary
113 to obtain an effective emergency communications system.
114 (d) A funding provision that identifies the cost necessary
115 to implement the emergency communications system.
116 (e)1.a. By January 1, 2029, each county, and every public
117 agency within such county, shall provide 911, emergency call,
118 and dispatch services from a unified 911 call center, operated
119 by the county or a regional entity created by an interlocal
120 agreement or other memorandum of agreement, decided by a
121 unanimous vote of the Emergency Communication Center (ECC)
122 Executive Board or the Regional Emergency Communication Center
123 (RECC) Executive Board, as applicable, pursuant to this
124 paragraph.
125 b. Upon establishment of a unified 911 call center, all
Page 5 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1427-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1427 2026
126 state funds for emergency services shall be redirected to each
127 county that operates the unified 911 call center. A county that
128 provides or receives 911, emergency call, and dispatch services,
129 but does not establish a unified 911 call center pursuant to
130 this paragraph, may not receive state funds for emergency
131 services.
132 2.a. Within 90 days after July 1, 2026, in order for a
133 county to establish a unified 911 call center pursuant to this
134 paragraph, the board of county commissioners shall convene an
135 ECC executive board. The chair of the board of county
136 commissioners or his or her designee shall serve as the chair of
137 the ECC executive board. The membership of the ECC executive
138 board shall consist of the city manager or strong mayor, as
139 applicable, of the largest municipality in each county by
140 population size that provides law enforcement, fire, and EMS
141 services, and each agency head that provides law enforcement,
142 fire, and EMS services operating in the county as of July 1,
143 2026.
144 b. By January 1, 2027, the ECC executive board must decide
145 by a unanimous vote, the entity for the county that will operate
146 its unified 911 call center. Funding for such entity must also
147 be decided by a unanimous vote of the ECC executive board and
148 the funding shall be provided by the county and participating
149 municipalities and agencies or any combination thereof. Any
150 funding after the establishment of a unified 911 call center
Page 6 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1427-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1427 2026
151 required by this paragraph may not exceed any net increase in
152 the annual purchasing power of the dollar, as reflected in the
153 Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, unless agreed to
154 by a unanimous vote of the ECC executive board.
155 3.a Within 90 days after July 1, 2026, in order for a
156 county to establish a regional unified 911 call center pursuant
157 to this paragraph, the board of county commissioners of the
158 county with the largest population participating in the regional
159 unified 911 call center shall convene an RECC executive board.
160 The chair of the board of county commissioners or his or her
161 designee shall serve as the chair of the RECC executive board.
162 The membership of the RECC executive board shall consist of:
163 (I) The chair of the board of county commissioners, or his
164 or her designee, from each participating county.
165 (II) The city manager or strong mayor, as applicable, of
166 the largest municipality in each participating county by
167 population size.
168 (III) Every agency head within each participating county
169 that provides law enforcement, fire, and EMS services operating
170 in the participating counties as of July 1, 2026.
171
172 Notwithstanding membership requirements in this subparagraph,
173 RECC executive board responsibilities and requirements shall
174 mirror the ECC executive board responsibilities and requirements
175 pursuant to this paragraph.
Page 7 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1427-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1427 2026
176 b. By January 1, 2027, the RECC executive board must
177 decide by a unanimous vote, the entity for the region that will
178 operate its unified 911 call center for the participating
179 counties. Funding for such entity must also be decided by a
180 unanimous vote of the RECC executive board and the funding shall
181 be provided by the participating counties, municipalities,
182 agencies, or any combination thereof. Any funding after the
183 establishment of a unified 911 call center required by this
184 paragraph may not exceed any net increase in the annual
185 purchasing power of the dollar, as reflected in the Consumer
186 Price Index for All Urban Consumers, unless agreed to by three-
187 fourths vote of the RECC executive board.
188 4. A county that has an established entity, as of July 1,
189 2026, that provides law enforcement, fire, and EMS services to
190 all government provided first responder agencies in the county
191 shall convene an ECC executive board pursuant to subparagraph 2.
192 to ensure that the requirements of this paragraph are met.
193 5.a. Following the establishment of a unified 911 call
194 center by a county pursuant to this paragraph, the ECC executive
195 board shall serve as an advisor to the entity that operates the
196 unified 911 call center. The ECC executive board may convene at
197 a time and place as determined by the chair of the board.
198 Membership of the ECC executive board shall consist of:
199 (I) One member of the board of county commissioners or his
200 or her designee.
Page 8 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1427-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1427 2026
201 (II) One representative from the county's city council, or
202 his or her designee.
203 (III) The sheriff or his or her designee.
204 (IV) The police chief and the fire chief of the county.
205
206 Members may serve on a rotating basis within their respective
207 category of representation as established by the implementing
208 rules created by the ECC executive board.
209 b. Following the establishment of a regional unified 911
210 call center pursuant to this paragraph, the RECC executive board
211 shall serve as an advisor to the entity that operates the
212 regional unified 911 call center. The RECC executive board may
213 convene at a time and place as determined by the chair of the
214 board. Membership of the RECC executive board shall consist of:
215 (I) One member of the board of county commissioners, or
216 his or her designee, from each participating county.
217 (II) One representative, or his or her designee, from the
218 city council of each participating county.
219 (III) The sheriff, or his or her designee, from each
220 participating county.
221 (IV) The police chief and the fire chief from each
222 participating county.
223
224 Members may serve on a rotating basis within their respective
225 category of representation as established by the implementing
Page 9 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1427-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1427 2026
226 rules created by the RECC executive board.
227 6.a. An entity that operates a unified 911 call center
228 shall maintain its headquarters in one location to serve as the
229 primary public safety answering point (PSAP). However, an entity
230 may maintain offices or answering points at various other
231 locations throughout this state, as required and determined by a
232 public agency. An entity shall designate an alternate center to
233 the PSAP. Such center may only receive emergency calls when the
234 PSAP is unable to receive emergency calls.
235 b. An entity that operates a regional unified 911 call
236 center shall maintain its headquarters in one location to serve
237 as the PSAP, but may maintain offices or answering points at
238 various locations, as required and determined by the public
239 agencies. However, the entity must designate an alternate center
240 to the PSAP. Such center may only receive emergency calls when
241 the PSAP is unable to receive emergency calls.
242 7.a. By January 1, 2027, if a county has not established
243 the operation of a unified 911 call center pursuant to this
244 paragraph, the sheriff of the county shall be deemed the entity
245 to provide 911, emergency call, and dispatch services in the
246 county. All existing 911 operations within a county shall be
247 integrated under the sheriff to create a 911 call center, and
248 every public agency within the county shall participate in the
249 911 call center to provide such services.
250 b. If the sheriff provides 911, emergency call, and
Page 10 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1427-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1427 2026
251 dispatch services, the state funds for emergency services shall
252 be redirected to the sheriff for the sole purpose of operating
253 the unified 911 call center and may not be distributed to the
254 county. The county shall provide total funding for the 911 call
255 center, as determined by the annual needs assessment and as
256 requested by the sheriff, but the county does not have any right
257 or control over the funds or equipment of the center.
258 Expenditures for operating the 911 call center may not be
259 included in the sheriff's budget under s. 30.49. Such
260 expenditures shall be included in the county's budget in
261 accordance with the provisions of chapter 129.
262 8.a. An entity or regional entity that provides 911,
263 emergency call, and dispatch services from a 911 call center may
264 not transfer any emergency call received by the entity to any
265 other PSAP or call center, unless at least one firefighting, law
266 enforcement, ambulance, medical, or other emergency services
267 professional, as applicable, has been dispatched in response to
268 the emergency call received by the entity.
269 b. This subparagraph does not prohibit the transfer of an
270 emergency call to another PSAP or emergency communications
271 center if the reported emergency occurs outside the
272 jurisdictional boundaries of the local government where the
273 headquarters of the 911 call center is located. In such cases,
274 the emergency call shall be promptly transferred to the
275 appropriate jurisdiction, consistent with established
Page 11 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1427-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1427 2026
276 interagency protocols and mutual-aid agreements.
277 9.a. An entity or regional entity that provides 911,
278 emergency call, and dispatch services from a 911 call center
279 shall maintain interoperability with other emergency
280 communications centers in this state. Such entities shall
281 maintain proactive cybersecurity standards adopted by the
282 National Institute of Standards and Technology, as outlined in
283 the Task Force on Optimal Public Safety Answering Point
284 Architecture Guidelines. Such entities shall include
285 cryptographic inventory and ongoing cryptographic monitoring
286 services, and incorporate behavioral-based, packet-level
287 monitoring at all times from a Security Operations Center
288 located in the United States.
289 b. To aid in interoperability and public safety, a vendor
290 of computer-aided dispatch systems and interoperable radio
291 communications systems must provide, at no additional cost, the
292 built-in capability to interface with different PASP CAD systems
293 and other radio communications systems that, although not
294 operated or maintained by the vendor, are used in this state by
295 911 call centers. In addition, a vendor may not impose any
296 additional licensing or integration fee for any system that
297 enables integration of such systems, including, but not limited
298 to, radio communications systems, CAD systems, cyber security
299 systems, telephone communication systems, interoperability
300 gateway systems, and Radio over Internet-Protocol (RoIP) gateway
Page 12 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1427-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1427 2026
301 systems, used in this state by a 911 call center.
302 c. Every 911 call center and PSAP, and any related system,
303 including, but not limited to, interoperability gateway systems
304 and secure IP communications systems that enable cross-system
305 radio communications, shall be deemed critical infrastructure in
306 this state.
307 d. As used in this subparagraph:
308 (I) "Critical infrastructure" has the same meaning as in
309 s. 119.0725(1).
310 (II) "Interoperability" means the technical ability to
311 communicate across disciplines and jurisdictions statewide.
312 (III) "Interoperability gateway" system means a network
313 device or platform that provides protocol translation, audio
314 transcoding, routing, and talk-group management between
315 otherwise incompatible radio systems, Voice over Internet
316 Protocol (VoIP) systems, public safety LTE network systems,
317 mission critical push-to-X services systems, satellite systems,
318 and IP-based communications systems.
319 (IV) "Radio over Internet Protocol (RoIP) Gateway" system
320 means hardware or software that enables radio communications to
321 be transmitted, received, patched, or controlled across IP
322 networks.
323 10.a. By January 1 2027, and by January 1, 2029, the chair
324 of the ECC executive board, the chair of the RECC executive
325 board, or the sheriff, as applicable, shall certify in writing
Page 13 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1427-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1427 2026
326 to the office that the county or each participating county, as
327 applicable, has taken the required action to comply this
328 paragraph and has established an entity or regional entity to
329 provide 911, emergency call, and dispatch services.
330 b. By January 30, 2027, and by January 1, 2029, the office
331 shall submit a report to the Governor, the President of the
332 Senate, and the Speaker of House of Representatives, describing
333 the results of establishing 911 call centers in this state,
334 identifying any county that has not established such a center in
335 violation of this paragraph.
336 11. A county that does not comply with this paragraph by
337 January 1, 2029, shall have its emergency funding reduced by 25
338 percent for each year the county does not comply.
339
340 The office shall be responsible for the implementation and
341 coordination of such plan. The office shall adopt any necessary
342 rules and schedules related to public agencies for implementing
343 and coordinating the plan, pursuant to chapter 120.
344 Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 14 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1427-00